Utah statutes.
13-32a-102.5.   Administration and enforcement.

(1)  The division shall administer and enforce this chapter in accordance with the authority under Title 13, Chapter 2, Division of Consumer Protection.

(2)  The attorney general, upon request, shall give legal advice to, and act as counsel for, the division in the exercise of its responsibilities under this chapter.

(3)  Reasonable attorney fees, costs, and interest shall be awarded to the division in any action brought to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(4)  Municipal and county law enforcement agencies, prosecutorial agencies, and governmental agencies may enforce the criminal and civil provisions of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 284, 2012 General Session

